Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2444.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. * * *(a.2) A firefighter who has served four or more years in continuous firefighting, who had direct exposure to a carcinogen and who, prior to engaging in firefighting duties, passed a physical examination that failed to reveal any evidence of cancer is presumed to have died as a result of the performance 12345678910111213141516171819 of the firefighter's duties for purposes of this act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2444PN3254 - 2 - 123